Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Organization.

Sec. 44.33.010.
Commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development is the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development. Except with respect to the commissioner’s membership on the board of directors of the Alaska Railroad Corporation, whenever a statute provides that the commissioner is a member of a board, council, or other similar entity, the commissioner may designate an employee of the department to act in the commissioner’s place.

History.

(§ 14 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 186 SLA 1960; am § 95 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 55 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For errors in municipal assessment, valuation, or taxation records, see 3 AAC 139.

Collateral references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d, Commerce, §§ 27-41

2 Am. Jur. 2d, Administrative Law, § 1 et seq.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Funds, § 1 et seq.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 8.

15 C.J.S., Commerce, § 1 et seq.

73 C.J.S. Public Administrative Law and Procedure, §§ 10-29.

Sec. 44.33.020.
Duties of department; regulations.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall

advise and assist local governments;

advise the governor and other commissioners on the delivery of government services to rural areas, including services relating to public safety, justice, economic development, natural resource management, education, and public health;

make recommendations to the governor and other commissioners about policy changes that would affect rural governments and rural affairs;

serve as staff for the Local Boundary Commission;

conduct studies and carry out experimental and pilot projects for the purpose of developing solutions to community and regional problems;

promote cooperative solutions to problems affecting more than one community or region, including joint service agreements, regional compacts, and other forms of cooperation;

serve as a clearinghouse for information useful in solution of community and regional problems, and channel to the appropriate authority requests for information and services;

advise and assist community and regional governments on matters of finance, including but not limited to bond marketing and procurement of federal funds;

prepare suggested guidelines relating to the content of notice of bond sale advertisements, prospectuses, and other bonding matters issued by local governments;

administer state funds appropriated for the benefit of unorganized regions within the state, allowing for maximum participation by local advisory councils and similar bodies;

as assigned through a delegation by the governor, administer and implement the state’s role in the federal community development quota program established under 16 U.S.C. 1855(i) or a successor federal program; the department may adopt regulations under a delegation from the governor to implement duties under this paragraph;

carry out those administrative functions in the unorganized borough that the legislature may prescribe;

study existing and proposed laws and state activities that affect community and regional affairs and submit to the governor recommended changes in those laws and activities;

coordinate activities of the state that affect community and regional affairs;

assist in the development of new communities and serve as the agent of the state for purposes of participation in federal programs relating to new communities;

supervise planning, management, and other activities required for local eligibility for financial aid under those federal and state programs that provide assistance to community and regional governments;

advise and assist municipalities on procedures of assessment, valuation, and taxation, and notify municipalities of major errors in those procedures;

apply for, receive, and use funds from federal and other sources, public or private, for use in carrying out the powers and duties of the department;

request and utilize the resources of other agencies of state government in carrying out the purposes of this chapter to the extent the utilization is more efficient than maintaining departmental staff, reimbursing the other agencies when appropriate;

administer state and, as appropriate, federal programs for revenue sharing, community assistance, grants, and other forms of financial assistance to community and regional governments;

administer the state programs relating to commerce or community development, enforce the laws relating to these programs, and adopt regulations under these laws;

register corporations;

collect corporation franchise taxes;

enforce state laws regulating public utilities and other public service enterprises, banking and securities, insurance, and other businesses and enterprises touched with a public interest;

make veterans’ loans;

furnish the budgeting, clerical, and administrative services for regulatory agencies and professional and occupational licensing boards not otherwise provided for;

conduct studies, enter into contracts and agreements, and make surveys relating to the economic development of the state and, when appropriate, assemble, analyze, and disseminate the findings obtained;

provide factual information and technical assistance for potential industrial and commercial investors;

receive gifts, grants, and other aid that facilitate the powers and duties of the department from agencies and instrumentalities of the United States or other public or private sources;

establish and activate programs to achieve balanced economic development in the state and advise the governor on economic development policy matters;

formulate a continuing program for basic economic development and for the necessary promotion, planning, and research that will advance the economic development of the state;

cooperate with private, governmental, and other public institutions and agencies in the execution of economic development programs;

review the programs and annual reports of other departments and agencies as they are related to economic development and prepare an annual report on the economic growth of the state;

administer the economic development programs of the state;

perform all other duties and powers necessary or proper in relation to economic development and planning for the state;

request tourism-related businesses in the state to provide data regarding occupancy levels, traffic flow and gross receipts and to participate in visitor surveys conducted by the department; data collected under this paragraph that discloses the particulars of an individual business is not a matter of public record and shall be kept confidential; however, this restriction does not prevent the department from using the data to formulate tourism economic impact information including expenditure patterns, tax receipts and fees, employment and income attributable to tourism, and other information considered relevant to the planning, evaluation, and policy direction of tourism in the state;

provide administrative and budgetary services to the Real Estate Commission under AS 08.88 as requested by the commission;

sell at cost, to the extent possible, publications and promotional materials developed by the department;

as delegated by the governor, administer under 16 U.S.C. 1856 the internal waters foreign processing permit procedures and collect related fees;

administer state laws relating to the issuance of business licenses;

comply with AS

15.07.055

to serve as a voter registration agency to the extent required by state and federal law, including 42 U.S.C. 1973gg (National Voter Registration Act of 1993);

carry out other functions and duties, consistent with law, necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purpose of this chapter;

oversee the administration of outstanding loans and financial assistance under the Alaska BIDCO assistance program under former AS

37.17.500

— 37.17.690 ;

supply necessary clerical and administrative services for the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and the Marijuana Control Board.

The department may adopt regulations necessary to carry out its statutory functions.

History.

(§ 14 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 186 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 1 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 1965; am E.O. No. 33 (1968); am § 4 ch 94 SLA 1969; am § 6 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 116 SLA 1976; am § 96 ch 218 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 39 § 13 (1977); am E.O. No. 40 § 2 (1979); am § 4 ch 62 SLA 1979; am E.O. No. 47 § 6 (1980); am § 33 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 57 § 2 (1984); am § 1 ch 120 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 104 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986; am § 70 ch 138 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 65 § 3 (1987); am § 43 ch 85 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 68 § 7 (1988); am § 3 ch 36 SLA 1989; am E.O. No. 74 § 7 (1989); am E.O. No. 79 § 3 (1991); am E.O. No. 82 § 16 (1993); am § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997; am E.O. No. 98 § 16 (1997); am § 56 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 95 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 6 ch 2 SLA 2004; am E.O. No. 112 § 3 (2004); am § 2 ch 150 SLA 2004; am § 7 ch 55 SLA 2012; am § 7 ch 4 SLA 2015; am § 16 ch 44 SLA 2016; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 13, art. 1.

For business duties and restrictions, see 3 AAC 13, art. 2.

For examinations, reports, and records, see 3 AAC 13, art. 3.

For Alaska regional economic assistance program, see 3 AAC 57.

For silver hand and “made in Alaska” programs, see 3 AAC 58.

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

For standards for dissolution of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 9.

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

For state aid to municipalities and other recipients, see 3 AAC 130.

For population determination for municipal oil and gas production property, see 3 AAC 131.

For program eligibility, see 3 AAC 132, art. 2.

For procedures, see 3 AAC 132, art. 3.

For definitions, see 3 AAC 132, art. 4.

For program eligibility, see 3 AAC 134, art. 2.

For procedures, see 3 AAC 134, art. 3.

For definitions, see 3 AAC 134, art. 4.

For farm and agricultural land, see 3 AAC 138.

For fisheries revitalization: southeast Alaska salmon marketing matching grants, see 3 AAC 141, art. 1.

For fisheries revitalization: southeast Alaska targeted fisheries assistance matching grants, see 3 AAC 142, art. 1.

For eligibility for oil spill community assistance grant program, see 3 AAC 143, art. 1.

For application procedure, see 3 AAC 143, art. 2.

For fisheries revitalization: southeast Alaska sustainable salmon fisheries, see 3 AAC 144, art. 1.

For fisheries revitalization:
economic development matching grants, see 3 AAC 145.

For fisheries revitalization: Alaska salmon marketing grants, see 3 AAC 147.

For fisheries revitalization: targeted fisheries assistance, see 3 AAC 148, art. 1.

For introductory provisions, see 3 AAC 150, art. 1.

For eligibility for NPR-A impact assistance, see 3 AAC 150, art. 2.

For procedures for allocation of NPR-A impact assistance, see 3 AAC 150, art. 3.

For appeal procedures, see 3 AAC 150, art. 4.

For safe communities program, see 3 AAC 151.

For program eligibility, see 3 AAC 152, art. 2.

For program procedures, see 3 AAC 152, art. 3.

For definitions, see 3 AAC 152, art. 4.

For community development block grant program, see 3 AAC 168.

For temporary fiscal relief for municipalities, unincorporated communities, see 3 AAC 175.

For small municipal energy assistance, see 3 AAC 176, art. 1.

For community energy assistance, see 3 AAC 176, art. 2.

For western Alaska community development quota program, see 6 AAC 93.

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For specialty contractor trades, see 12 AAC 21, art. 2.

For mechanical contractor, see 12 AAC 21, art. 3.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

For prohibited conduct, see 12 AAC 64, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, added (a)(45) [now (a)(44)].

The 2015 amendment, effective May 5, 2015, in (a)(45) [now (a)(44)], inserted “and the Marijuana Control Board” following “Alcoholic Beverage Control Board”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a)(20), inserted “community assistance” following “revenue sharing”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 13, 2018, in (a)(43), substituted “oversee the administration of outstanding loans and financial assistance under the Alaska BIDCO assistance program under former AS

37.17.500

– 37.17.690.” for “administer the Alaska BIDCO assistance program under AS

37.17.500

– 37.17.690 and adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of those statutes.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 26, SLA 2018 (HB 340), which amended (a)(43) of this section, see 2018 House Journal 2378.

Sec. 44.33.022.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 44.33.025.
Recording. [Repealed, E.O.
No. 47, § 6 (1980).]

Sec. 44.33.026.
Alaska regional economic assistance program. [Repealed, § 3 ch 94 SLA 1988. For current provisions, see AS 44.33.896.]

Secs. 44.33.030 — 44.33.060.
Power development. [Repealed, § 10 ch 79 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 44.33.065.
Regional seafood development associations.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall assist in and encourage the formation of a qualified regional seafood development association for each seafood development region identified in (b) of this section for the purpose of promoting and marketing Alaska seafood products harvested in the region. The commissioner shall designate the first organization to apply and qualify under this subsection for recognition as the qualified association for a region to be the qualified regional seafood development association for that seafood development region if the commissioner determines that the organization

is established for the following purposes:

promotion of seafood and seafood by-products that are harvested in the region and processed for sale;

promotion of improvements to the commercial fishing industry and infrastructure in the seafood development region;

establishment of education, research, advertising, or sales promotion programs for seafood products harvested in the region;

preparation of market research and product development plans for the promotion of seafood and their by-products that are harvested in the region and processed for sale;

cooperation with the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute and other public or private boards, organizations, or agencies engaged in work or activities similar to the work of the organization, including entering into contracts for joint programs of consumer education, sales promotion, quality control, advertising, and research in the production, processing, or distribution of seafood harvested in the region;

cooperation with commercial fishermen, fishermen’s organizations, seafood processors, the Alaska Fisheries Development Foundation, the Fisheries Industrial Technology Center, state and federal agencies, and other relevant persons and entities to investigate market reception to new seafood product forms and to develop commodity standards and future markets for seafood products;

provides for representation of commercial fishing permit holders for each fishery in the region that is subject to a seafood development tax levied under AS

43.76.350

—

43.76.399

on the board of directors of the organization;

provides for membership in the organization by any commercial fisherman who holds a commercial fishing permit for a fishery that is conducted in the region and by other persons and groups in the region who wish to be members of the organization; and

is organized as a nonprofit corporation under the laws of the state for the purpose of marketing and promoting seafood products taken in the region and seafood products taken in fisheries subject to a seafood development tax levied under AS

43.76.350

—

43.76.399

.

Seafood development regions are established for each of the following regions of the state and are made up of the designated commercial fishing management areas established by the Board of Fisheries in accordance with the boundaries of those areas as adopted by the Board of Fisheries:

Southeast Alaska seafood development region — Southeastern Alaska area and Yakutat area;

Prince William Sound seafood development region — Prince William Sound area;

Cook Inlet seafood development region — Cook Inlet area;

Kodiak seafood development region — Kodiak area;

Alaska Peninsula seafood development region — Alaska Peninsula area;

Aleutian Islands seafood development region — Aleutian Islands area;

Chignik seafood development region — Chignik area;

Atka-Amlia Islands seafood development region — Atka-Amlia Islands area;

Bristol Bay seafood development region — Bristol Bay area;

Kuskokwim seafood development region — Kuskokwim area;

Yukon-Northern seafood development region — Yukon-Northern area and Kotzebue area;

Norton Sound-Port Clarence seafood development region — Norton Sound-Port Clarence area.

An organization may be designated as the qualified regional seafood development association for more than one seafood development region.

A qualified regional seafood development association for a fishery may request state financial assistance from the department to aid the seafood development programs of the association.

A qualified regional seafood development association requesting state financial assistance shall submit an annual financial report to the department on a form provided by the department. The department may require that a qualified regional seafood development association use a uniform system of accounting. A qualified regional seafood development association requesting state assistance shall submit an annual budget to the department on or before a date specified by the department.

The department may adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

In this section, “fishery” has the meaning given in AS

16.43.990

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For regional seafood development association, see 3 AAC 149, art. 1.

Sec. 44.33.110.
Civil Air Patrol. [Repealed, E.O.
No. 33 (1968).
For current provisions, see AS 18.60.146.]

Sec. 44.33.112.
Fees for publications, research data, and other services.

The commissioner may establish by regulation and the department may charge reasonable fees for department publications, research data, and other centralized administrative services to cover the cost of reproduction, printing, mailing, distribution, and other centralized administrative services.

History.

(§ 57 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.113.
Charges for community development quota program.

If the governor delegates duties as described in AS

44.33.020(a)(11)

to the department, the department shall determine and assess an annual administrative cost charge for the administration of the state’s role in the federal community development quota program. The department shall by regulation establish the method for implementing the charge in accordance with the provisions of this section. The department shall assess the charges on community development quota groups with approved community development plans for the fiscal year for which the charge is applicable. The community development quota group shall pay the charge.

The administrative cost charge under this section for a CDQ group shall be determined by the department no later than the June 30 immediately preceding the start of the applicable fiscal year. The department shall promptly notify the CDQ group of the amount of the charge. The CDQ group shall pay the charge no later than 45 days after the department provides notice to the CDQ group of the amount of the charge.

The aggregate total of administrative cost charges to all CDQ groups for a fiscal year shall approximately equal, but may not exceed, the appropriations authorized for that fiscal year for the state’s role under AS

44.33.020(a)(11)

, less

appropriations from sources of program receipts under AS

37.05.146(b)

and (c) not collected under this section; and

any reappropriations of charges collected under this section.

Fifty percent of the aggregate total of administrative cost charges assessed on all CDQ groups for a fiscal year shall be recovered through the standard portion of the charges and 50 percent of the aggregate total shall be recovered through the variable portion of the charges. The administrative cost charge assessed on a CDQ group for a fiscal year shall consist of a standard portion and a variable portion. The CDQ group’s standard portion is calculated by dividing the aggregate total amount to be recovered through this portion by the number of CDQ groups to be assessed a charge. The CDQ group’s variable portion is calculated by multiplying the aggregate total amount to be recovered through this portion by a percentage that represents the ratio of the value of the CDQ group’s fisheries resource quota allocation to the total value of fisheries resources allocated under the CDQ program for the applicable year.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this section, the department may adjust the variable portion of the administrative cost charge for a fiscal year to one or more CDQ groups if the department finds that an inequitable result will occur absent the adjustment, but the aggregate total of the charges to be paid by all CDQ groups after the adjustment must equal the amount originally calculated for that fiscal year under (c) of this section.

The department may not assess or collect administrative charges under this section from new CDQ groups representing communities that are not eligible for the CDQ program on June 30, 2000, for a period of two years from the actual award of a fisheries quota to that newly formed CDQ group.

The department shall collect and enforce the administrative cost charge assessed under this section. The receipts from the charge assessed under this section shall be deposited in the community development quota program account in the state treasury. Under AS

37.05.146(c)

, receipts from charges collected under this section shall be accounted for separately, and appropriations from the account are not made from the unrestricted general fund. The legislature may appropriate money from the community development quota program account for expenditures by the department for necessary costs incurred by the department in implementing any assigned role under AS

44.33.020(a)(11)

or for any other public purpose.

The Department of Administration shall identify the amount of the appropriations for the state’s role under AS

44.33.020(a)(11)

that lapses into the general fund each year. The legislature may appropriate an amount equal to the lapsed amount to the community development quota program for its operating costs for the next fiscal year.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to interpret or implement its duties under this section.

In this section,

“CDQ group” or “community development quota group” means an applicant under 16 U.S.C. 1855(i), or a successor program, with an approved community development plan;

“CDQ program” or “community development quota program” means the federal community development quota program established under 16 U.S.C. 1855(i), or a successor federal program approved by the United States Secretary of Commerce;

“fiscal year” has the meaning given in AS

37.05.920

;

“value” has the meaning given in AS

43.75.290

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 101 SLA 2000; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 150 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (c), “AS

37.05.146(b)

and (c)” was substituted for “AS

37.05.146

(b)” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of
AS

37.05.146

, and in subsection (g), “AS

37.05.146(c)

” was substituted for “AS

37.05.146(b)

” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of
AS 37.05.146.

Sec. 44.33.115.
Exxon Valdez oil spill unincorporated rural community grant fund.

There is created in the department the Exxon Valdez oil spill unincorporated rural community grant fund. The fund consists of money appropriated to the fund from the Exxon Valdez oil spill restoration fund, the Alyeska settlement fund, and other sources. Appropriations to the fund do not lapse unless otherwise provided by the legislature in the bill making the appropriation to the fund. The department may use the fund to make grants to unincorporated rural communities in the area affected by the Exxon Valdez oil spill for capital projects for purposes of restoring, replacing, or enhancing subsistence resources or services or other services damaged or lost as the result of the Exxon Valdez oil spill. In this section,

“Alyeska settlement fund” means the trust fund established in the state treasury for the purpose of receiving, holding, and disbursing the settlement proceeds received by the state under the Agreement and Consent Decree in re: The Exxon Valdez, United States District Court, District of Alaska, Case No. A92-175 Civil, decree entered November 25, 1992;

“Exxon Valdez oil spill restoration fund” means the fund established by the Department of Revenue to implement the judgment entered by the United States District Court for Alaska in the criminal case United States of America v. Exxon Shipping Company and Exxon Corporation, No. A90-015 CR.

History.

(§ 57 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.118.
Definitions.

In AS

44.33.010

—

44.33.118

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 57 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.